Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 5

State Lands Generally

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Preambles.

Acts 1983, No. 696, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, in some areas of the state the rights-of-way of state highways are wider than necessary and mowing and other maintenance of such excess area is not economically practical; and

“Whereas, if the entire area of such rights-of-way is not properly managed it becomes unattractive and may become a fire and smoke hazard; and

“Whereas, a substantial part of the excess rights-of-way along state highways is suitable for growing pine; and

“Whereas, it would appear that planting of pine in those portions of state highways that are not needed for roadways, shoulders and other highway related uses, and on other lands owned by the state or the Highway and Transportation Department, such as barrow pits and dirt pits would not only beautify such areas but if properly managed and sold could be a source of revenues to the state; and

“Whereas, since the State Highway and Transportation Department and the State Forestry Commission are the two agencies that would be directly involved in any such program, those agencies should investigate the feasibility of initiating such program;

“Now, therefore….”

22-5-101. Program for growing pine on highway rights-of-way — Responsibilities of Arkansas Forestry Commission — Thinning practices — Disposition of proceeds.

(a)

The Arkansas Department of Transportation shall determine those state highway rights-of-way that are wider than necessary for highway purposes and those borrow pits, dirt pits, and other highway-related lands owned by the state or the department that could be used to produce pine timber for pulpwood or other uses and shall submit a listing of these areas to the Arkansas Forestry Commission which shall inspect the areas to determine if they are suitable for planting and growing pine.

(b)

If the department and the Arkansas Forestry Commission determine that there are enough such areas to make it feasible to initiate a program for planting and producing pine thereon, the two agencies shall cooperatively initiate and maintain such program as soon as practicable.

(c)

When a program authorized by this section is initiated, the Arkansas Forestry Commission shall have the responsibility for all planting and management under the program and for applying appropriate silvicultural practices thereto, including the harvesting and marketing of wood products so produced.

(d)

If the department determines that traffic safety demands that different thinning practices than those normally applied in the management of such timber are required to accommodate highway safety, the Arkansas Forestry Commission shall make arrangements for thinning of the timber growth along the rights-of-way in the manner and to the extent directed by the State Highway Commission.

(e)

When a program authorized by this section is initiated, the net proceeds derived from the sale of pine grown on the state highway rights-of-way or other highway-related areas owned by the state or the department shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues. Fifty percent (50%) thereof shall be credited to the State Highway and Transportation Department Fund, and fifty percent (50%) thereof shall be credited to the State Forestry Fund.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 696, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 9-740 — 9-742.

Cross References.

Natural resources to be used for road maintenance, §27-67-209.

Subchapter 2

— Commissioner of State Lands

Cross References.

Fees, §21-6-203.

Preambles.

The Joint Resolution of 1869, No. 16, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, by the act providing for the appointment of a Commissioner of Immigration and State Lands, approved July 15, 1868, it was omitted to require a bond of the person holding said office;

“Therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1857, p. 94, § 22: effective on passage.

Acts 1868, No. 20, § 20: effective on passage.

22-5-201. Oath.

The Commissioner of State Lands shall take an oath that he or she will not, directly or indirectly, be engaged in the purchase of lands belonging to the state, to be sold by him or her during his or her continuance in office, and that he or she will not, directly or indirectly, engage in any speculation in swamp and overflowed lands or give information to any agent, friend, or secret or other partner, so as to secure the advantages of such information to himself or herself to any person, association, or company, to the prejudice or exclusion of other persons.

History.

Acts 1853, § 5, p. 161; 1857, § 21, p. 94; C. & M. Dig., § 6572; Pope's Dig., § 8603; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-102.

22-5-202. Bond.

(a)

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner of State Lands to give bond, with good and sufficient security to be approved by the Governor, in the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), for any moneys and other property belonging to the state which may be in or may come into his or her possession and for the faithful performance of his or her official duties.

(b)

The bond shall be given to the State of Arkansas and shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

History.

Joint Res. 1869, No. 16, p. 212; C. & M. Dig., § 6573; Pope's Dig., § 8604; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-103.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to §21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See §21-2-703.

22-5-203. Seal.

The Commissioner of State Lands shall be provided with an official seal for the use of his or her office, and every official paper or document issued by the Commissioner of State Lands shall have the seal of his or her office thereupon, or thereto attached. The seal shall authenticate every official paper issued by him or her.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 20, § 18, p. 61; C. & M. Dig., § 6574; Pope's Dig., § 8605; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-104.

22-5-204, 22-5-205. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning commissioner's salary and deputy commissioners, were repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1296, § 80. The sections were derived from the following sources:

22-5-204. Acts 1913, No. 302, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 8676; Pope's Dig., § 11414; Ark. Const. Amend. 56, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-105.

22-5-205. Acts 1871, No. 32, § 3, p. 98; C. & M. Dig., § 6576; Pope's Dig., § 8607; Acts 1943, No. 200, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-106.

22-5-206. Control over state's lands.

The landed interests of this state shall be controlled by the Commissioner of State Lands, and he or she shall dispose of them as provided by law.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 331, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-107.

22-5-207. Lands forfeited to state for taxes.

(a)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall have charge and control of the disposition of all lands that have been forfeited to the state for nonpayment of taxes legally assessed thereon, and he or she shall dispose of the forfeited lands as provided by law.

(b)

The Auditor of State is directed to furnish to the Commissioner of State Lands a complete list of all lands so forfeited to the state each year, within thirty (30) days after the time fixed by law, for settlement by collectors of revenue. This list shall show all the lands in this state forfeited to the state for nonpayment of taxes thereon in the year for which the titles are made.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 20, § 9, p. 61; C. & M. Dig., § 6579; Pope's Dig., § 8610; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-111.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be affected by Title 26, Chapter 37.

Cross References.

Furnishing list of tax-forfeited lands to assessor, §26-28-107.

22-5-208. Books, plats, and maps.

(a)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall take possession and have charge of all the books, papers, evidences of title, plats, and maps of all internal improvement, seminary, saline, and swamp and overflowed lands.

(b)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall proceed to complete all the books, papers, plats, and maps that may be delivered to him or her by the Auditor of State if any are incomplete.

(c)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall make out for each township in this state, in which there are any of the lands described in subsection (a) of this section, township maps in which he or she shall carefully classify the internal improvement lands, seminary lands, saline lands, and swamp and overflowed lands, each description making a classification unto itself and to be discriminated one from the other in such maps or plats.

(d)

The maps or plats shall be kept in the office of the Commissioner of State Lands and, at all times during ordinary business hours, shall be open to the examination of any person interested in state lands or desiring to purchase any state lands.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 20, §§ 6, 7, p. 61; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6578, 6580, 6581; Pope's Dig., §§ 8609, 8611, 8612; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-108, 10-109.

Cross References.

Correction of descriptions in office of Commissioner of State Lands, §26-26-720.

22-5-209. Deeds, abstracts, and contracts affecting state lands filed in office of Commissioner of State Lands — Additional information — Failure to comply — Definition.

(a)

All deeds, abstracts, contracts, and other evidences of title to realty belonging to the State of Arkansas shall be filed in the office of the Commissioner of State Lands to be preserved by the Commissioner of State Lands as the other public records and files of his or her office.

(b)

Separately for each item of real property in the possession of a state agency, the state agency shall maintain and furnish to the Commissioner of State Lands a record containing:

(1)(A)

The official recording information shown by the county recorder's records and the legal description of the real property.

(B)

A copy of the most recent deed to the real property may be furnished to the Commissioner of State Lands if the copy contains the official recording information and the legal description;

(2)

If the real property was purchased by a state agency, the date of purchase and the purchase price; and

(3)

The name of the state agency holding title to the real property for the state.

(c)

If the description of real property required under subsection (b) of this section is excessively voluminous, the Commissioner of State Lands may permit the state agency in possession of the real property to furnish the description in summary form.

(d)

If a state agency does not comply with this section, the Commissioner of State Lands shall report the failure to comply to the Governor, who shall notify the administrative officer of the state agency to immediately report to him or her the reasons for the state agency's failure to comply.

(e)

Willful failure to comply with this section by a public official shall constitute nonfeasance in office.

(f)(1)

As used in this subchapter, “state agency” means an instrumentality of state government, including without limitation an office, a department, an agency, a board, a commission, or an institution of the state.

(2)

As used in this subchapter, “state agency” does not include:

(A)

The Arkansas Department of Transportation;

(B)

An institution of higher education;

(C)

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

(D)

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

(E)

The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission; or

(F)

The Division of Emergency Management.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 172, §§ 1, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-112, 10-113; Acts 2019, No. 884, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1883, No. 13, § 1, provided that all original certificates for the purchase of lands filed by the Auditor of State in the office of the Treasurer of State, as well as all other evidences of title to state lands in the custody of the Treasurer of State, would be filed in the office of the Commissioner of State Lands, to be preserved by the Commissioner of State Lands as the other public records and files of his or her office.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “Additional information” in the section heading; rewrote (b); added (c); redesignated part of former (b) as (d); in (d), added “If a state agency does not”, deleted “the provisions of subsection (a) of” following “comply with”, and substituted “the state agency to immediately report to him or her the reasons for the state agency’s failure” for “the office, department, agency, or institution to immediately report to him or her the reasons for his or her failure or refusal”; redesignated former (c) as (e); in (e), deleted “or refusal” following “failure” and substituted “a public official” for “any officer”; and added (f).

22-5-210. Real property records of various departments, institutions, and retirement systems.

(a)

With respect to real property administered by the Arkansas Department of Transportation, an institution of higher education, the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, and the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System:

(1)

The department, an institution of higher education, the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, and the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall each maintain inventory records of the real property it owns; and

(2)

The Commissioner of State Lands may:

(A)

Review, verify, and maintain inventory records of the real property; and

(B)

In cooperation with each affected state agency, prepare reports and make recommendations concerning the best use of the real property.

(b)

At the request of the Commissioner of State Lands:

(1)

The department shall submit its real property inventory records that are not related to the roadways and bridges it maintains; and

(2)

No more than semiannually, the real property inventory records of an institution of higher education, the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, and the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may be submitted to the Commissioner of State Lands for information purposes only.

(c)

The duties of the Commissioner of State Lands under this subchapter and §22-5-301 et seq. do not apply to:

(1)

Real property that is owned by the state but is managed by the United States Government;

(2)

The real property composing the State Capitol complex;

(3)

The real property composing the Arkansas Governor's Mansion;

(4)

The real property composing the state veterans' cemetery system;

(5)

Highway rights-of-way owned by the department;

(6)

The real property composing the Old State House Museum;

(7)

The real property owned by the Division of Emergency Management; and

(8)

Real property that is managed by a state retirement system as a part of its trust assets.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 884, § 3.

Subchapter 3

— Administration

Effective Dates.

Acts 1945, No. 49, § 7: Feb. 14, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “Due to the fact that hundreds of thousands of acres of state-owned, tax-forfeited lands are now on the books of the Commissioner of State Lands and open for sale, donation or transfer by the said Commissioner, and applications to purchase or donate most of said lands from the said Commissioner of State Lands are being received daily, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and it being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, safety and welfare, this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

22-5-301. Policy.

It is declared to be the policy of the State of Arkansas:

(1)

To provide for the development and conservation of the human and soil resources of the state;

(2)

To protect the lands owned by the state and to provide for their classification and best use in the interests of the future general welfare and agricultural well-being of the state;

(3)

To encourage the settlement of the farm families of the state upon family-sized tracts under conditions conducive to successful farming;

(4)

To preserve land in public ownership suited for public use as forests, parks, or other purposes;

(5)

To cooperate with federal agencies having similar and allied objectives; and

(6)

To protect and promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 331, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-401.

22-5-302. Subchapter controlling.

Insofar as any provision of this subchapter is inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this subchapter shall be controlling.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 331, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-417.

22-5-303. Additional duties of Commissioner of State Lands.

In addition to other duties and powers conferred by law upon the Commissioner of State Lands, he or she shall:

(1)

Effectuate the policies and carry out the purposes declared in §22-5-301, including:

(A)

Securing the cooperation and assistance of the United States and any of its agencies; and

(B)

Entering into contracts, agreements, and conveyances necessary to secure such federal assistance;

(2)

Conduct investigations, independently or jointly with other state and federal agencies, relating to conditions and factors affecting, and methods of accomplishing more effectively, the purposes of this subchapter;

(3)

Assign lands to the several state agencies for administration, subject to their agreement and acceptance; and

(4)

Review, compile, and maintain inventory records of the real property owned by the State of Arkansas based upon the information submitted under §§22-5-209 and22-5-411 and the records in his or her office.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 331, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-402; Acts 2019, No. 884, § 4; 2019, No. 972, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 884 rewrote (1), adding the (1)(A) and (1)(B) designations; added (4); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 972 rewrote (1), adding the (1)(A) and (1)(B) designations; and made stylistic changes.

22-5-304. Survey in case of doubtful location of state lands — Actions to quiet title.

(a)

In cases where the location of lands claimed by the state appears to be doubtful or subject to controversy because of faulty descriptions or otherwise, the Commissioner of State Lands shall cause those lands to be surveyed in order to accurately locate the lands or shall request the assistance of other state agencies and of state and county officers and employees in ascertaining the location of the lands.

(b)

The Commissioner of State Lands may request the Attorney General to bring an action to confirm or quiet title to the land in the state.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 331, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-403.

22-5-305. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the State Land Use Committee, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 884, § 5, and by Acts 2019, No. 972, § 2, effective July 24, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1939, No. 331, §§ 4, 10; 1945, No. 49, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-404 — 10-406.

22-5-306. Appraisers — Qualifications, oath, and bond.

(a)

The Commissioner of State Lands may appoint appraisers to inspect and appraise state-owned lands for sale, transfer, or donation.

(b)

Each appraiser selected shall, by education or experience, be familiar with and know how to arrive at the value of lands, water rights, mineral rights, timber lands, rural lands, agricultural lands, and noncultivable lands; shall understand legal descriptions of real properties; shall have a working knowledge of county and state real property records; and shall be capable of passing dependable judgments upon the values of rural properties.

(c)

Upon entering the duties of his or her office, each appraiser shall take an oath of office as prescribed in Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, § 20. This oath shall state that he or she will not, directly or indirectly, be engaged in the purchase of state-owned lands during his or her continuance in office and that he or she will not engage in any speculation of state-owned lands or give information to any agent, friend, or secret or other partner so as to secure the advantages of that information to himself or herself or to any person, association, or company to the prejudice or exclusion of other persons.

(d)

Each appraiser shall enter into bond to the state in the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000), to be furnished by a surety company authorized to do business in the State of Arkansas, conditioned that he or she will faithfully discharge all of his or her duties according to law and the rules of the Commissioner of State Lands.

(e)

After qualifying as provided in this section, each appraiser shall perform his or her duties in the manner prescribed by the Commissioner of State Lands.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 49, §§ 1-5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-407 — 10-411; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2365; 2019, No. 884, § 6; 2019, No. 972, § 3.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 884, § 6 specifically amended this section as amended by Acts 2019, No. 315.

Acts 2019, No. 972, § 3 specifically amended this section as amended by Acts 2019, No. 315.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (e) [now (d)].

The 2019 amendment by No. 884, in (a), substituted “may appoint” for “shall appoint”, deleted “such” preceding “appraisers”, and deleted “as are provided for by any appropriation” following “appraisers”; deleted former (b) and
redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and substituted “Commissioner of State Lands” for “State Land Use Committee” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 972, in (a), substituted “may appoint” for “shall appoint”, deleted “such” preceding “appraisers”, and deleted “as are provided for by any appropriation” following “appraisers”; and substituted “Commissioner of State Lands” for “State Land Use Committee” in (e).

22-5-307. Classification and disposition of state lands generally.

(a)

State lands shall be classified as to whether they should be retained in public ownership or returned to private ownership through sale or donation, and the classification may be changed.

(b)(1)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall dispose of the lands and make deeds to the lands in accordance with the classification under subsection (a) of this section.

(2)

With the approval of the Governor and review by the General Assembly or the Legislative Council, lands classified as suitable for return to private ownership may be sold under subsection (e) of this section to private parties by the Commissioner of State Lands.

(c)

The Commissioner of State Lands may direct that land shall be retained and administered by certain appropriate state or local agencies or shall be disposed of and deeded in such manner that the state shall be eligible for any benefits under any act of the United States Congress.

(d)

Where lands are disposed of by return to private ownership, the deeds shall contain such restrictive covenants or restraints on alienation as the Commissioner of State Lands may deem necessary to ensure the protection and use of the land in a manner beneficial to the public. All coal, oil, gas, and mineral rights shall be reserved to the state except in the case of tax-forfeited lands. However, the original owner or his or her heirs shall be allowed to redeem or acquire these lands in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter without the oil, gas, and mineral rights being restricted or reserved.

(e)(1)

Where land is classified as land which should be returned to private ownership by sale, the Commissioner of State Lands shall offer the land for sale to the highest bidder, but only if his or her bid is at least equal to the appraised value.

(2)

Land shall not be sold for less than its appraised value, except that, pending appraisal, the Commissioner of State Lands is authorized to continue sales of state lands as provided for in §§26-37-101 —26-37-105,26-37-201 —26-37-205, and26-37-301 —26-37-303.

(f)

Land shall not be donated by the Commissioner of State Lands until it has been classified as appropriate for donation by the Commissioner of State Lands.

(g)

If, at the end of three (3) years after appraisal by the Commissioner of State Lands, lands classified as land which should be returned to private ownership by sale shall remain unsold on the books of the Commissioner of State Lands, the unsold lands shall be reappraised by the Commissioner of State Lands.

(h)

Tax-delinquent lands are not subject to the terms and restrictions of this section and may be disposed of as required by law.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 331, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-412; Acts 2013, No. 1463, § 2; 2019, No. 884, § 7; 2019, No. 972, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted “allocated for agricultural settlement, as provided in §22-5-308” following “public ownership” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 884 redesignated (b) as (b)(1) and (b)(2); in (b)(1), substituted “the classification under subsection (a) of this section” for “this classification”; in (b)(2), substituted “With the approval of the Governor and review by the General Assembly or the Legislative Council” for “Only”, substituted “may be sold under subsection (e) of this section” for “shall be subject to sale”, and substituted “parties” for “individuals”; substituted “Commissioner of State Lands” for “State Land Use Committee” in the first sentence of (d); deleted “by the committee” following “appraisal” in (e)(2); substituted “Commissioner of State Lands” for “committee” in (f) and twice in (g); added (h); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 972 redesignated (b) as (b)(1) and (b)(2); in (b)(1), substituted “the classification under subsection (a) of this section” for “this classification”; in (b)(2), substituted “With the approval of the Governor and review by the General Assembly or the Legislative Council” for “Only”, substituted “may be sold under subsection (e) of this section” for “shall be subject to sale”, and substituted “parties” for “individuals”; substituted “Commissioner of State Lands” for “State Land Use Committee” in the first sentence of (d); deleted “by the committee” following “appraisal” in (e)(2); substituted “Commissioner of State Lands” for “committee” in (f) and twice in (g); added (h); and made stylistic changes.

Cross References.

Tax-forfeited lands, §22-6-501 et seq.

22-5-308 — 22-5-311. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning agricultural lands in manner prescribed by federal government, agricultural land donations, agricultural land sales to adjoining landowners, and agricultural land development, were repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1463, § 3. These sections were derived from the following sources:

22-5-308. Acts 1939, No. 331, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-413.

22-5-309. Acts 1939, No. 331, §
7; A.S.A. 1947, §
10-414.

22-5-310. Acts 1939, No. 331, §
8; A.S.A. 1947, §
10-415.

22-5-311. Acts 1939, No. 331, §
9; A.S.A. 1947, §
10-416.

Subchapter 4

— Title to Lands

Preambles.

Acts 1901, No. 127, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, owners of land along navigable rivers often suffer by having such land washed away; and

“Whereas, under existing laws if such land reforms as an island in a navigable stream though within the original boundary of the former owner, it belongs not to him but to the state ….”

Acts 1953, No. 126, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, many cutoffs have been made in the Mississippi River, and other rivers in the State of Arkansas, both naturally and artificially for the purpose of controlling the current of the river and the bank stabilization, and many old former river beds have remained as the result of such cutoffs and have gradually built up and reached the high-water mark as defined by the Supreme Court of Arkansas in the case of St. Louis, Iron Mt. & S. Ry. Co. v. Ramsey, 53 Ark. 314, 13 S.W. 931 (1890), and permanent timber vegetation has grown on all or parts of said old abandoned riverbeds; and

“Whereas, it is intended hereby to clarify the intent of Act 203 of the General Assembly approved March 8, 1945, and to eliminate any question as to the intent thereof;

“Therefore, Sections 1 and 2 of Act 203 of the 1945 General Assembly are hereby respectively amended to read as follows….”

Acts 1981, No. 830, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, in a recent decision, the Arkansas Supreme Court, for the first time, ruled that the Mulberry River is a navigable stream; and

“Whereas, prior to said decision, the Mulberry River had been considered non-navigable for all purposes and consequently it was assumed that the bed of the stream was owned by adjacent property owners; and

“Whereas, prior to said Supreme Court ruling and based on the assumption that the stream bed was owned by adjacent property owners, many of the adjacent property owners executed oil and gas leases on their lands, including the bed of the Mulberry River; and

“Whereas, under the ruling of the Supreme Court that the Mulberry River is navigable, the bed of the Mulberry River is owned by the State of Arkansas and the ownership thereof by the state has caused considerable confusion regarding previously executed oil and gas leases and in order to eliminate such confusion it is in the best interests of all concerned that the State of Arkansas relinquish all right, title an interest in the oil and gas and other minerals underlying the bed of the Mulberry River;

“Now therefore….”

Acts 1981, No. 872, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the Supreme Court of Arkansas in finding that the Mulberry River was a navigable stream did so by expanding the decision of navigability to include recreational purposes; and

“Whereas, under prior decisions the test for navigability had been commercial usage; and

“Whereas, the Arkansas Supreme Court found the Mulberry River to be navigable based upon its new test of recreational usage; and

“Whereas, by so redefining navigability using a new definition of recreational usage affected and changed the assumption that the adjacent property owners owned to the center of the streambed which had existed since Arkansas became a state in the union;

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1851, § 19, p. 108: effective on passage.

Acts 1905, No. 183, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1911, No. 10, § 2: declared effective on passage.

Acts 1915, No. 194, § 2: Mar. 20, 1915. Emergency declared.

Acts 1921, No. 671, § 3: March 29, 1921. Emergency declared.

Acts 1931, No. 245, § 3: March 31, 1931. Emergency declared.

Acts 1937, No. 47, § 2: Feb. 5, 1937. Emergency clause provided: “It is ascertained by the General Assembly and declared to be a fact that the title to certain real estate is defective because of errors committed by certain corporations and that by reason of said defective titles persons, in fact, holding title to said lands are unable to convey the same. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the same shall take effect immediately upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1963, No. 525, § 2: Mar. 19, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there are many owners of sixteenth section school lands in this state who are unable to cure or quiet their titles to such lands due to lost deeds that were never recorded or due to the fact that such records have been destroyed by fire, and that this situation is working a hardship on the citizens of this state and should be corrected immediately. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in force from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 872, § 2: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the decision of the Arkansas Supreme Court in holding the Mulberry River to be navigable seriously impaired the oil and gas leases, farming leases and the sale of property along the Mulberry River; that the boundary lines of property owners have been materially affected in that they now cannot be determined without additional court action; that this act is immediately necessary to correct this situation and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

22-5-401. Suits to recover state's property or quiet title.

(a)

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General, and any assistant attorney appointed by the Governor on a contingency fee not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%), to institute suit in the name of the state to recover any forgotten, lost, or other outstanding public interest or property or to quiet title to any lands, whether surveyed or unsurveyed, whether known or hereafter discovered, to which the state, either in law or equity, may have or claim title, and which for any reason may not appear on the records of the Commissioner of State Lands.

(b)

It shall also be the duty of the Attorney General and any assistant attorney to investigate the records of the Commissioner of State Lands for the purpose of determining whether title has been obtained to any of the state's lands by any illegal or fraudulent methods. If it shall appear that title is held by any person, company, or corporation to any lands through or by any conveyance from the state obtained by fraudulent or false acts or means, statements, or oaths, the Attorney General and assistant attorneys shall institute suit in the proper court to cancel the conveyance and recover those lands.

(c)

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General and his or her assistants to make a detailed list and description of any such lands and file the list with the Commissioner of State Lands after the lands shall have been adjudicated as the property of the state.

(d)

If suit is brought to recover or quiet title in equity, an order may be obtained for the sale of the land as in the case of sales of lands upon decree in equity, and, after paying expenses, the balance of the purchase money shall be deposited into the State Treasury.

(e)

This section shall not apply to persons who hold title to lands at the time of any alleged forfeiture for taxes or to their grantees, where the taxes have been continuously paid since the alleged forfeitures.

History.

Acts 1915, No. 194, § 1; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4532, 9295; Pope's Dig., §§ 5589, 11981; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-201.

22-5-402. Tax title void when in conflict with state's interest.

No tax title shall be valid or binding against the equitable or legal interest of this state in or to any real estate whatever. However, such tax titles shall be void so far as they shall conflict with the interest of the state and shall be treated and considered as null and void in both law and equity in all courts of the state.

History.

Acts 1851, § 13, p. 108; C. & M. Dig., § 6779; Pope's Dig., § 8707; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-214.

22-5-403. Title to lands formed in navigable waters.

(a)

All land which has formed or may form in the navigable waters of this state, and within the original boundaries of a former owner of land upon such waters, shall belong to and the title thereto shall vest in the former owner, his or her heirs or assigns, or in whoever may have lawfully succeeded to the right of the former owner therein.

(b)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the rights or interests of third parties in any such land acquired before the passage of this section.

History.

Acts 1901, No. 127, §§ 1, 2, p. 197; C. & M. Dig., § 6783; Pope's Dig., § 8709; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-202, 10-203.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage of this section,” Acts 1901, No. 127, was signed by the Governor on April 26, 1901, and took effect on that date.

Acts 1971, No. 148, § 6, provided in part that the act did not repeal §22-5-403.

Cross References.

Islands formed in navigable waters are property of state, §22-6-202.

22-5-404. Title to lands formed in nonnavigable lakes or abandoned river channels.

(a)

The title to all lands which have formed or may form in the beds of nonnavigable lakes, or in abandoned river channels or beds, whether or not still navigable, which reformed lands or alluvia are above the ordinary high-water mark, shall vest in the riparian owners to the lands and shall be assessed and taxed as other lands.

(b)

The lands referred to in subsection (a) of this section shall include those lands which have emerged or which may emerge by accretion, reliction, evaporation, drainage, or otherwise from the beds of lakes or from former navigable streams, whether by natural or artificial causes, or whether or not the lakes were originally formed from the channel or course of navigable or nonnavigable streams.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 203, §§ 1, 2; 1953, No. 126, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-204, 10-205.

22-5-405. Deeds to lands in lakes or rivers.

(a)

The Commissioner of State Lands is empowered and authorized to execute deeds to lands described in §22-5-404 to riparian owners upon application and the filing of proof of record ownership of adjacent lands and proof of proper survey of the lands, conveying all the right, title, and interest of the State of Arkansas to lands as have emerged or may emerge to the mean high-water mark of any such stream or lake.

(b)

All applicants for deeds under this section shall, upon filing an application therefor, deposit with the Commissioner of State Lands the estimated cost of survey of the lands to be fixed by the Commissioner of State Lands. He or she shall thereupon direct the county surveyor of the county in which the lands are located, or some other competent surveyor to be selected by the Commissioner of State Lands, to accurately survey the lands and compile the field notes and plat the lands in reference to the survey of adjacent lands, by the extension of township, range, and section lines, and to file the field notes and plats in the office of the Commissioner of State Lands.

(c)

Upon the filing of the field notes and plats, the Commissioner of State Lands shall pay for the cost of the survey of lands applied for out of the money deposited as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

(d)

The applicant shall, after the filing of the field notes and survey, file affidavits of at least three (3) competent persons having full personal knowledge of the facts, stating that the lands applied for have actually emerged to high-water mark and are capable of cultivation, whereupon the Commissioner of State Lands may issue the deed upon the payment of a deed fee of five dollars ($5.00).

History.

Acts 1945, No. 203, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-206, 10-207.